Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.130

Similar brands not to be recorded.

The director shall not record a brand that is identical to a brand of present record; nor a brand so similar to a brand of present record that it will be difficult to distinguish between the brands when applied to livestock.

[ 2003 c 326 s 14; 1959 c 54 s 13.]